S&P 500
5,638.94
(
2.13%
)
US TECH 100
19,167.20
(
2.31%
)
Dow Jones
41,488.19
(
1.65%
)
Brent Oil
70.29
(
0.00%
)
Bitcoin
83,970.65
(
-0.45%
)
Cookie and Privacy Policy
Last Updated: October 6, 2023
InvestorsHub.com, Inc. (“Investors Hub”) is committed to protecting your privacy. We developed this Privacy Policy 
            to share with you our information collection practices and the options you have when visiting
, or using its 
            applications or related services (hereinafter referred to as “the Website” or “the Site”) via any client or application. 
            This Privacy Policy is an online Privacy Policy and applies only to information collected from you through this Website. 
            This Privacy Policy does not apply to information that you furnish to us offline or in any other manner except through 
            this Website.
Please note that other websites affiliated with InvestorsHub.com, Inc. may be governed by separate policies. When 
            visiting any of our other sites, please refer to its Privacy Policy.
By agreeing to the terms of this Site, you accept the practices described in this Privacy Policy.
Investors Hub occasionally may update this Privacy Policy. When we do, we will revise the "updated" date at the top of 
            the Privacy Policy. In the event that we make material changes to this Privacy Policy, we will notify you at our option 
            either by placing a prominent notice on the home page of our Website or by sending you a notification directly. We 
            encourage you to review this Privacy Policy periodically to stay fully informed about how we are protecting your personal 
            information.
Who is Collecting Your Information
Investors Hub and its affiliates are the sole owners of the information collected; except as otherwise provided in this 
            Privacy Policy, we will not sell, share or loan this information to any third party. However, we may use and share 
            aggregated information that does not personally identify you with third parties in order to improve the Site for our 
            Website users. You can always be assured the information we collect is used to provide a more personalized experience 
            for our Website users. Such "site usage" and statistical information may be made public information at Investors Hub’s 
            discretion.
Please note that we do not control all content served in conjunction with our Site. Investors Hub site may include 
            content from other parties that may perform user activity tracking other than that described herein. In particular, some 
            of our partners may use "cookies" in ways that we do not.
None of the required information and/or optional information collected on any form on this Website is used for other
            purposes than those stated on such form or in this Privacy Policy; however, as discussed below in more detail, Investors
            Hub may share information provided through the Website with third parties under contract with Investors Hub to assist in 
            providing certain services or other features offered to our Website users, such as ADVFN market data content. In the event 
            that Investors Hub utilizes a third party to provide such services, our contract with the third party will include 
            obligations upon the third party to keep all information obtained during such contract confidential and secure. For 
            additional information on how ADVFN collects and stores data, please visit https://www.advfn.com/common/legal/privacy.
What is Collected, and How Do We Use It
As referenced throughout this Privacy Policy, the term “Personally Identifiable Information” means any piece of information 
            that potentially can be used to uniquely identify, contact, or locate a single person and that Investors Hub collects from 
            you. Personally Identifiable Information includes, without limitation, the following: user name, password, first name, last 
            name, address, e-mail address, phone number, credit card number, IP addresses, device and client identifiers, 
            submissions to website including support requests, administrative history, public and private posts, and audio or video in 
            which you are depicted or identifiable.
Any Personally Identifiable Information collected by Investors Hub will be safeguarded to protect against unauthorized 
            access. Procedures are in place to secure any personal information provided to Investors Hub. Investors Hub stores your 
            personal information in a computer database on dedicated servers that allow only limited access. Investors Hub employs 
            commercially reasonable efforts to protect this information from loss, misuse, and other unauthorized disclosure, alteration 
            or destruction.
Although you may browse the public pages of our Website without registering or providing any Personally Identifiable 
            Information other than IP addresses, certain sections of our Site do include forms on which you may choose to supply 
            personalized information that will enable you to make purchases online, access premium content or receive individualized 
            services or features that we cannot offer anonymous users, and certain other pages of our Website can be accessed only 
            by registered users. You can always choose not to provide information; however, if you do choose not to provide such 
            information, you may not be able to make purchases via the Site, access certain areas of the Website, obtain premium 
            content, or take advantage of certain other Website features.
Except as necessary to facilitate or fulfill any aspect of any services, products or features that you purchase, request, 
            register for or subscribe to via the Website, or as otherwise set forth in this Privacy Policy, we will not intentionally 
            sell, lease, share or exchange your Personally Identifiable Information with any third party.
In order to access pages requiring registration, you will be required to create a User Account by completing the registration 
            form and creating a User ID, alias and password. If you create a User Account, Investors Hub collects certain Personally 
            Identifiable Information when you register, including your user name, alias, password, first name, last name, and e-mail 
            address. This information is stored for internal purposes only unless Investors Hub is required to disclose this information 
            pursuant to law or court order. However, if you post or send offensive, inappropriate or objectionable content anywhere on 
            Investor’s Hub, Investors Hub can use information available to it about you to stop such behavior. This may involve informing 
            relevant third parties such as your employer, school e-mail/Internet provider and law enforcement agencies about the content 
            and your behavior.
If you subscribe for premium services, such as Investors Hub's Message Board Packages or you wish to gift a subscription to 
            another person, a credit card number as well as contact for a third party recipient, if applicable, will be collected. It is 
            optional for you to decide whether to provide additional information beyond these items. Credit card information for subscriptions is never 
            stored on or by Investors Hub. It is processed entirely by Verisign or other similar third-party processor via secure 
            transaction. Note that credit card information may be stored by Investors Hub with respect to recurring Investors Hub Newswire 
            Services and for commercial advertising/marketing clients. For subscriptions to ADVFN's Real Time Market Data services, 
            ADVFN, a third-party, will collect credit card information for purposes of recurring subscriptions to this service.
The following are categories of information we collect:
Traffic Data
Web Browser type and version
Operating system
Specific web page on iInvestors HubHub
Referrer URL. (The URL from which you reach our website)
IP address
Date and time of access
Geo location based on IP address
Such data only enables Investors Hub to:
Provide non-identifiably analytics data
Improve the content of our website
Monitor any gaps in service delivery
Monitor and prohibit malicious activity on our website
Such data is stored on secure servers in a web server file format.
Google Analytics
Google Analytics is a web analysis service provided by Google Inc. ("Google"). Google utilizes the Data collected to track and examine the use
		of this Application, to prepare reports on its activities and share them with other Google services.
Google may use the Data collected to contextualize and personalize the ads of its own advertising network.
Personal Data collected: Cookies and Usage Data.
To opt out of Google analytics
click here.
ComScore
ComScore is media measurement and analytics company providing marketing data and analytics to advertisers. Advertisers on Investors Hub may use ComScore
		to target users based on their demographics. The data held by ComScore is governed by their
privacy policy
. 
        You can opt-out of browser tracking
here
. Investors Hub
		does not share your personal data with ComScore and does not take responsibility of processing and storage of your personal information if
		any of our advertising partners obtain your data from ComScore.
Facebook
The Facebook Like button and social widgets are services allowing interaction with the Facebook social network provided by Meta Platforms, Inc.
This type of service allows interaction with the Facebook platforms directly from Investors Hub.
The interaction and information obtained through Investors Hub are always subject to the User's privacy settings for Facebook.
Facebook might collect traffic data for the pages where the service is installed, even when Users do not use it.
Twitter
The Twitter Tweet button and social widgets are services allowing interaction with the Twitter social network provided by Twitter, Inc.
Twitter may collect cookie and usage data even when the service is not used.
Personal Information
Data collected upon registration
When creating a user account on Investors Hub, the following personal information is collected, including but not limited to:
First Name
Last Name
Alias
Password
Email Address
Tracking Cookie (Optional if you registered via an Investors Hub marketing campaign)
Date and Time
Your consent to process this information
Your consent to receive our email services
IP address
If you have consented for us to process your information, Investors Hub will process, use and store this data for the following purposes:
Our authentication service to log you into the website;
Our marketing service to evaluate which campaigns work best;
To allow the use of all personalized functionality on the website;
For fraud protection and quality control;
If we do not receive your consent to store and process the above information we will be unable to provide any of our personalized 
        (i.e login required) services.
Data collected upon activation
After registering with Investors Hub, you will be sent an email with a link to activate your account. By clicking on service activation link, we will
			collect the following information:
Date and time
Your Country based on your IP Address
Reference to the email content we sent to you
(Optional) Your consent to receive our email service
The activation email verifies that you have access to the email address you supplied which will be used to communicate the purchase of our service 
            subscription or major site affecting issues.
Data collected when purchasing an Investors Hub subscription:
Investors Hub subscriptions are processed by Paypal/Verisign. The following information is returned to Investors Hub by the processor:
Card type
Last 4 digits of account number
Card expiration YYMM
Date and Time
Transaction ID
Email Services
If you give consent to receive our email services, Investors Hub will distribute the following types of emails to you:
Notifications when new messages arrive in your Investors Hub mailbox
News and periodical reports - We send snapshots on the recent market activity.
Service Announcements - Updates for improvement to our website and special offer to our subscriptions.
Third party communications - Content provided by third parties.
Newswire - Press releases, investment opinion reports or marketing pieces provided by third parties.
You can manage the email services and the types of communications you receive by:
Clicking the unsubscribe link at the bottom of our email;
Visiting https://ih.advfn.com/common/unsubscribe and entering your email address in the space provided;
Contacting customer services at help@investorshub.com or telephone 1-888-992-3836
You can deactivate new message notifications by visiting
My Site Options
and setting the appropriate options to "No."
Advertising
Investors Hub may show you personalized adverts from one or more of our advertising partners. We do not share personal information like your name, 
    address, email address or phone number with our advertising partners.
Our advertising partners will store information about your interactions with their adverts. They will use this information to show you more relevant 
    adverts or limit the adverts you see. Generally, advertiser would track your interactions by using cookies. (To understand what cookies are and how 
    Investor Hub uses them please see "Investors Hub cookies" in this policy.) Information processed and stored by our advertising partners will be held 
    and governed in accordance with their privacy policy.
It may seem like Investors Hub have passed or received information about you by the clever way adverts work.
For example, you may have browsed Amazon's website before checking Investors Hub. Amazon will have access to your information and all the products 
    you nearly purchased. Amazon will also have placed a cookie to identify you. When Investors Hub shows to a generic Amazon advert, Amazon would be able to 
    identify you by their cookie and be able to personalize the advert for you. At no point is the information in the advert passed to Investors Hub 
    or information from Investors Hub passed to Amazon.
Here is a list of Investors Hub advertising partners who are not integrated with the consent management tool:
Advertiser
Privacy Policy
Opt Out
Google
Privacy policy
Opt out
Amazon
Privacy policy
Opt out
LiveRamp
Privacy policy
Opt out
Additionally, you can find out more and opt out of third party advertisers here:
youronlinechoices.com/uk/your-ad-choices
optout.networkadvertising.org/
This Site is affiliated with Publisher First, Inc. dba Freestar ("Freestar") for the purposes of placing advertising on the Site, 
        and Freestar will collect and use certain data for advertising purposes. To learn more about Freestar’s data usage,
click here.
LiveRamp
When you use our website and enter your email address on our website (either to log in, or to sign up for a newsletter, or similar), 
        we may share with LiveRamp and its group companies information that we collect from you, such as your email (in hashed, pseudonymous form), 
        IP address, or information about your browser or operating system, with any of the following, acting as "joint controllers" 
        (as applicable and defined in the GDPR).
LiveRamp uses this information to create an online identification code that we may store in our 
        first-party cookie for our use in online, in-app, and cross-channel advertising. This may be shared with advertising companies to enable 
        interest-based and targeted advertising. LiveRamp uses this information to create an online identification code for the purpose of recognizing 
        you on your devices. This code does not contain any of your directly identifiable personal data and will not be used by LiveRamp to 
        re-identify you. Detailed information on LiveRamp's data processing activities is available in LiveRamp's privacy policy
liveramp.com/privacy/
. You have the right to withdraw your consent or opt-out to the 
        processing of your personal data at any time at
liveramp.com/opt_out/
.
Notices
Our Website offers features that allow you to receive electronic alerts, including but not limited to Daily Markets Bulletin, 
            Forex Weekly News, Investors Hub Service Announcements, Commercial and Special Offers List, notices about updates to our 
            Website, other promotional announcements, new products and other information. When you sign up for such electronic alerts 
            or notices, we will collect certain Personally Identifiable Information, which may include without limitation your name, 
            mobile number (if you opt in to receive text alerts), e-mail address and other basic contact information. As noted, we will 
            send you occasional updates about the site, various market update information from us and our parent company, ADVFN, and 
            select advertising via email. In any such email you will have an "opt-out" link you can use to remove yourself from the lists 
            for any and all specific types of emails we may send, or you can contact us at support@InvestorsHub.com. We send the emails
            ourselves and do NOT give or sell your email address to marketers or anyone else.
Newsletters and Other Subscriptions.
Various pages on our Website include forms that permit you to subscribe to newsletters or other subscriptions. When you register 
            to receive newsletters or other subscriptions, we will collect certain Personally Identifiable Information, which may include 
            without limitation your name, address, phone number, e-mail address, confirmation of age and other basic contact information.
Online Purchases/Premium Content
If you order products or subscribe to premium content via our Website, we will collect Personally Identifiable Information, 
            which may include without limitation, name, address, phone number, e-mail address, and shipping and other contact information 
            for the recipient of the item (if different than yours), your name and account number (if applicable) as well as payment 
            information, such as credit card number, billing address, expiration date and other billing information. We do not store credit 
            card information after a transaction is completed, with the exception of payments for recurring Investors Hub Newswire Services and for 
            commercial advertising/marketing clients.
Surveys and Other Voluntary Demographic Information
In addition to the above information, certain forms on various pages throughout our Site may ask users to voluntarily provide a limited amount of demographic information. In addition, Investors Hub or its affiliates may conduct online surveys that ask you for demographic data, such as your zip code, age or income level. Investors Hub or Investors Hub's agents may also contact you by e-mail, using your e-mail address collected when you filled out one of the forms on our Website, with the option to participate in consumer research studies. Providing such demographic information and participating in such surveys or other consumer research are always voluntary. Investors Hub aggregates the responses we receive before using the information to improve the products and services we offer. We do not link your individual responses to your personal information at any time. Investors Hub uses this information only for internal marketing research to help us better serve our users and customers.
Marketing, Promotional or Other Transactional Communications
As noted above, if you have opted in to receive marketing, promotional or other informational communications from or on behalf 
            of Investors Hub, we may use your e-mail address from time to time to contact you to announce new features, products or services 
            that may be available in our stores or on our Website or to send news and information regarding Investors Hub or its products or 
            services. You can opt out of receiving these promotional communications at any time by following the instructions in the e-mail 
            or emailing support@InvestorsHub.com.
We may also use your e-mail address to contact you to verify and/or update any information related to services, features or 
            transactions that you have requested via our Website. Although you may opt out of the promotional e-mails as noted above, you 
            should be aware that, that as long as you use our products and services or otherwise maintain a business relationship with us,
            however, you may not opt out of receiving communications from us relating specifically to those products and services or that 
            business relationship.
Private Message and other Contact Pages
You may also provide Personally Identifiable Information to us when you voluntarily communicate with us, such as by requesting 
            information via e-mail, support requests, TOS reports, Requests for Deletion Review, utilizing the private message features on 
            the Website, or otherwise contacting us electronically. We may retain such Personally Identifiable Information for use and 
            disclosure consistent with this Privacy Policy.
Change in Ownership or Business Transfers
As we continue to develop our business, we might sell or buy assets. In such transactions, customer information generally is 
            one of the transferred business assets. Also, in the event that Investors Hub or substantially all of its assets are acquired, 
            customer information, including Personally Identifiable Information, will of course be one of the transferred assets to the 
            extent permissible under law.
Other Information
With your consent, we also collect additional information about how you use and access our Website to analyze trends, 
            administer our Website, track user’s navigation on the Site and gather broad demographic information for aggregate use, which 
            enables us to improve the Site by making it more accessible and easier to navigate. For example, we may automatically receive 
            and record information in our server logs from your browser, including your IP address (the Internet address of your PC), 
        the type and version of your web browser, referrer addresses and other generally-accepted log information. IP 
            addresses may be linked to other Personally Identifiable Information. We may also record page views (hit counts) and other 
            general statistical and tracking information, which will be aggregated with that of other users in order to understand how 
            our Website is being used.
Referrers
A “referrer” is the information passed along by a web browser that references the web URL you linked from and is automatically 
            collected by our Web server. We may collect and use this information to understand the Websites referring traffic to our Website 
            and to present appropriate content to our potential users. We may tabulate referrer information on an aggregate basis to identify 
            trends and traffic patterns. Investors Hub may share aggregated demographic information with our partners. This is not linked to 
            any personal information that identifies any individual person. Investors Hub may use your profile information to create 
            personalized content, offers, and services, but this information will only be used by Investors Hub and its affiliates.
Your right to access and update your personal information
You may have the right to access the personal information held about you. To
		obtain a copy of the personal information we hold about you, please send an
		email to
support@investorshub.com
or write to us at InvestorsHub.com, Inc.,
		 Suite 801-137, 3122 Mahan Dr, Tallahassee, FL 32308-2502
If there are any changes to your personal data or if you believe that the
		personal data we have about you is inaccurate, incomplete, misleading or
	not up-to-date, please contact
support@investorshub.com
so that we may
		take steps to update your personal data.
Disclosure of personal information
Investors Hub does not sell or share your personal information.
Your personal information is only shared with third parties when you access
		their adverts through our website and give explicit consent to those third
		parties to process and hold your personal information for that specific
		advert. If you consent to receive future adverts from those third parties,
		they will process and store your personal information for future
		communications. Information processed and stored by those third parties
		will be held and governed in accordance with their privacy policy. Note: Any pre-populated form fields are not sent
            to the third-party advertiser unless and until you choose to explicitly submit the form.
We may share your information with our related companies so that they can provide products and
		services to you where you consented.
As a part of providing you with our services, and for the management and
		operations of these services, and to comply with legal and regulatory
		requirements, we may be required or need to disclose your personal
		information to the following third parties:
Law enforcement, governmental or administrative agencies or when directed to
			do so by a court or tribunal of competent jurisdiction.
Data breach reporting
If a data security breach occurs, we will notify this to the relevant
		regulatory body promptly and in any event no later than 72 hours of
		discovery. Where we are unable to make such notification within 72 hours we
		will provide the reason for such delay.
Any individual impacted will be informed where there exists a high risk to
		the rights and freedom of the client. We will do so without undue delay.
Investors Hub may revise this privacy policy from time to time on this page. Please
		check back regularly for updates.
Cookies
What is a cookie
A cookie is a small text file that is store on your computer/device.
		They can be read by the site that created the cookie and yourself. A Website
		will use the cookie to read and write information to make the website work,
		or work in a better more efficient way.  By continuing to use this Website after your initial “opt-in” acceptance, you consent to our use of cookies.
Type of Cookie
Description & Example
Essential
These are cookies are required for the operation of the website.
CookiePrompt - Used to check if you have seen the consent management tool
SID - A secure unique id for logged in users
__cfduid - The __cfduid cookie is used to identify individual clients behind a shared IP address and apply security settings on a per-client basis.
More info
hubOrigID - This is used for legacy Investors Hub pages to store your account identification during and between visiting our site
Investors HubUserID - This is used to store your account identification during and between visiting our site
IHCheckSum - A unique id used to validate your browsing session with the website
username - This is used to determine your access level to market data originating from ADVFN
Analytics & Performance
They allow us to recognize and count the number of visitors and to see how visitors move around our website when they are using it. This helps us to improve the way our website works, for example, by ensuring that users are finding what they are looking for easily and speed up high volume pages.
Google Analytics is Google’s analytics tool that helps website and app owners to understand how their visitors engage with their properties. It may use a set of cookies to collect information and report website usage statistics without personally identifying individual visitors to Google. To view more infomation about the cookies used by Google Anayltics
click here
Advertising
These cookies record your visit to our website, the pages you have visited and the links you have followed. We will use this information to make our website and the advertising displayed on it more relevant to your interests.
					Investors Hub and its affiliate ADVFN operate an in-house advertising system which does not share any information with third parties.
OASISID, MKTA_THEOASIS, MKTA_GT - These cookies are used by Investors Hub's (ADVFN's) legacy advertising system
aas_vid, im - These cookies are used by Investors Hub's (ADVFN’s) current advertising system
To manage or find out more about third party advertising cookies please see our
advertising
section in our privacy policy.
How do you turn off cookies?
Your browser should let you control whether websites you visit can use
		cookies or not. If you are unsure how to do this, please consult the help
		files available via the Help menu in your browser or go to
allaboutcookies.org/manage-cookies/index.html
for online help.
Please note that turning cookies off will restrict your use of the website,
		stopping you from accessing many features that require you to be logged in.
Third party cookies
Third party partners of Investors Hub  use their own cookies and have their own
		privacy policies.
Third party cookies are used to gather statistics but cannot be used to
		identify individuals. We allow our partners to serve these third-party
		cookies, but we do not have access to them.
A large proportion of the advertisements you see on the website are
		generated by third parties.
Cookies are often used by these third-party partners to allow them to track
		the number of people who have clicked on or seen a particular advert or
		page and how many people have seen the advert or page more than once. Parts
		of this statistical data may be shared with us by third parties, allowing
		us to improve the targeting and placement of adverts on the website.
Your browser should let you disable third party cookies. If you are unsure
		how to do this, please see the
advertising
section in our privacy policy or
How do you turn off cookies
above.
Your Consent
By accepting these terms, you consent to our online privacy policy.
Special Notification with respect to Children's Privacy (Users under the age of 18)
In response to concerns about protecting children's privacy online, Congress enacted the Children's Online Privacy Protection Act of 
            1998 ("COPPA"), which sets forth rules and procedures governing the ways in which Web sites may collect, use and disclose any personal 
            information for children under the age of 13. Further, the General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”) requires that EU-resident users 
            be at least 16 years old. Investors Hub does not target children under the age of 18 and does not offer or knowingly sell any of its 
            products or services to children. Moreover, Investors Hub DOES NOT:
Request or knowingly collect personally identifiable online or offline contact information from users under 18 years of age;
Knowingly use or share personal information from users under 18 years of age with third parties;
Give children the ability to publicly post or otherwise distribute personally identifiable contact information;
Entice children with the prospect of a special game, prize or other activity to divulge more information than is needed 
                    to participate in the activity.
Other Disclosure
Investors Hub and its affiliates may disclose any or all of your Personally Identifiable Information if we are required to do so
            by law or in the good faith belief that such action is necessary to: (a) conform to the law or comply with legal process served 
            on us (for example, under a subpoena, court order or other regulatory requirement or to maintain or protect the security of the 
            Website); (b) protect and/or defend our rights or property or other legal interests or of any Website user; or (c) act in urgent 
            circumstances to protect the safety of the public or other users of the Website. This includes exchanging information with other 
            companies and organizations for fraud protection and credit risk reduction.
From time to time we receive requests to disclose the identities of our users. As noted above, we do not disclose the identities 
            of our users unless we are legally required to do so. However, you should be aware that the identifying information specific to your 
            use of Investors Hub, including your IP address, name, and email address will be delivered when requested by a legal subpoena, 
            subject to the following:
If a governmental agency (for example, the Securities and Exchange Commission, law enforcement agencies, United States Attorneys' 
            offices or similar governmental agencies) sends us a subpoena, we will comply with it. If we receive a subpoena by a third party 
            that is not a governmental agency (for example, a subpoena in connection with civil litigation), we will attempt to contact the 
            user whose identity has been requested using the contact information the user provided during the registration process including 
            by email and/or a message sent to your Investors Hub account so that you may seek to prevent our delivery of this information or 
            quash the subpoena. We will wait 10 days after notifying the user before complying with the subpoena by disclosing the identity 
            of the user, unless the subpoena requires us to disclose this information before then. If we cannot wait 10 days because of the 
            deadline in the subpoena, we will advise the user of the deadline included in the subpoena when we provide notice that we received it.
If you are a paying subscriber to Investors Hub, you are able to send and receive private messages using our database system. 
            Our policy is that we will not deliver the contents of private messages to anyone, even when demanded via subpoena. As a user 
            of Investors Hub, however, you should understand that this is no guarantee that we won't someday be forced by a court to deliver
            this information. It hasn't happened yet, but please be advised that it is possible.
For more information on our policies for handling subpoenas, please visit our
Subpoena Policy
.
Access to and Ability to Correct Personal Data
Upon request via postal mail, e-mail, or phone, Investors Hub will provide you a summary of any personal information retained by 
            Investors Hub regarding you.  Investors Hub will only send personal records to the e-mail address associated with you once it 
            has verified the requestor is the true account owner. Request for this information should be made to: support@InvestorsHub.com.
Use of Third Parties or Agents by Investors Hub
As noted earlier, Investors Hub may employ third parties or other companies to perform functions on our behalf, such as processing 
            and fulfilling online orders or requests, such as online purchases or other transactions via the Website, processing credit card 
            payments, shipping or delivering packages, providing customer service, sending print and electronic mail, removing repetitive 
            information from customer and e-mail lists, maintaining and analyzing information collected and/or stored via the Website, hosting 
            sites from this Website, measuring the effectiveness of promotions and e-mails, performing analyses of users’ activities on
, serving images via our Website, and fulfilling other functions necessary to our business.
Investors Hub also may use third party vendors or other companies to assist in providing certain services, products and 
            communications to you, such as delivering newsletters, alerts and other communications to those Website users who have opted 
            in to receive them. In the event that we utilize third party vendors or companies to provide any of the services described 
            above or similar services, we may need to share your Personally Identifiable Information with them to enable those companies 
            to perform their obligations. However, we will provide these companies only with that information necessary to perform their 
            functions on our behalf, and we will not authorize them to use your Personally Identifiable Information for any other purpose. 
            In such event, these companies are required to agree, in writing, that they will abide by the privacy statement and privacy 
            standards implemented herein, including the relevant confidentiality and security provisions.
Data Retention
Your personal information will be kept only as long as needed to provide the services to you and fulfill the purposes described 
            in this Policy. Retention periods will vary depending on the type of information collected and how it is used. When the 
            information is no longer needed and there is no need for us to retain it to comply with legal or regulatory obligations, we will 
            remove it from our system and any personally identifiable information will be depersonalized.
Security
You should be aware that there is an inherent risk in transmitting any data electronically. This risk is inherent in all 
            Internet dealings. Consequently, we cannot guarantee that any Personally Identifiable Information transmitted will be prevented 
            from being viewed or used by any particular person and therefore, you agree to hold us harmless from and against any injury, 
            financial or otherwise, that results from such unauthorized viewing or use. Moreover, e-mails sent to us over the Internet are 
            susceptible to detection, decryption, eavesdropping or tampering. Thus, you agree to hold us harmless from and against any harm, 
            financial or otherwise, that results from such detection, decryption, eavesdropping or tampering of e-mails.
In the event that a breach occurs that results in a high risk to you, we aspire to notify you within 72 hours of the breach and
            will take all necessary steps to mitigate any issue. In addition, you must take steps to maintain the security of your private 
            information by keeping your password and other personal information confidential. It is important for you to protect against 
            unauthorized access to your password and to your computer. Be sure to sign off when finished using a shared computer.
Updating Your Information and Opting Out.
Investors Hub may (depending on your jurisdiction) permit you to withdraw your consent and decline -- or “opt-out of” – having your personal information 
            collected, or used for marketing purposes, certain mailings and other materials we may offer. You may opt-out by contacting us 
            via e-mail at support@InvestorsHub.com, or write to us with your request, at the mailing address as follows: InvestorsHub.com, 
            Inc., 3122 Mahan Drive, Suite 801-137, Tallahassee, Florida, 32308-2502. You may also follow the instructions in the e-mail 
            that you receive. If you do not want to receive e-mail from us, your most immediate recourse is to update your preferences on
this page
by entering the e-mail address that is receiving the e-mail, checking/unchecking the appropriate selections and then clicking 
            the Update button at the bottom of the page.  By seeking account removal or opting out, you may no longer be able to participate 
            in some or all of Investor Hub’s sites. When Investors Hub removes your personal data upon request, the removal will not include removal or 
            deletion of forum posts.
Links
Our Site may contain links to other sites. Please be aware that Investors Hub is not responsible for the privacy policies of other 
            sites. We encourage our Website users to be aware when they leave our Website and to read the privacy statements of each and every 
            Website that collects Personally Identifiable Information. This Privacy Policy applies solely to the information collected by our 
            Website.
Questions about Our Privacy Policy
If you choose to visit our Website, your visit and any dispute over privacy is subject to this Privacy Policy and our Terms of 
            Service, including limitations on damages and application of the law of the state of Florida. Please let us know if you have any 
            questions about our Privacy Policy. Simply send us an e-mail to support@investorshub.com.
Go Ad-Free
Subscribe to Ad free and enjoy an ad-free experience
Try Now
Keep the Ads
We Care About Your Privacy
We and our
872
partners store and access personal data, like browsing data or unique identifiers, on your device. Selecting "I Accept" enables tracking technologies to support the purposes shown under "we and our partners process data to provide," whereas selecting "Reject All" or withdrawing your consent will disable them. If trackers are disabled, some content and ads you see may not be as relevant to you. You can resurface this menu to change your choices or withdraw consent at any time by clicking the ["privacy preferences"] link on the bottom of the webpage [or the floating icon on the bottom-left of the webpage, if applicable]. Your choices will have effect within our Website. For more details, refer to our Privacy Policy.
We and our partners process data to provide:
Use precise geolocation data. Actively scan device characteristics for identification. Store and/or access information on a device. Personalised advertising and content, advertising and content measurement, audience research and services development.
List of Partners (vendors)
I Accept
Your Privacy
Performance Cookies
Functional Cookies
Targeting Cookies
Strictly Necessary Cookies
Store and/or access information on a device
707 partners can use this purpose
Personalised advertising and content, advertising and content measurement, audience research and services development
838 partners can use this purpose
Use precise geolocation data
266 partners can use this special feature
Actively scan device characteristics for identification
135 partners can use this special feature
Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
536 partners can use this special purpose
Deliver and present advertising and content
542 partners can use this special purpose
Match and combine data from other data sources
381 partners can use this feature
Link different devices
339 partners can use this feature
Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically
511 partners can use this feature
Save and communicate privacy choices
358 partners can use this special purpose
Your Privacy
We process your data to deliver content or advertisements and measure the delivery of such content or advertisements to extract insights about our website. We share this information with our partners on the basis of consent and legitimate interest. You may exercise your right to consent or object to a legitimate interest, based on a specific purpose below or at a partner level in the link under each purpose. These choices will be signaled to our vendors participating in the Transparency and Consent Framework.
More information
List of IAB Vendors‎
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Cookies Details‎
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Cookies Details‎
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Cookies Details‎
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Cookies Details‎
Store and/or access information on a device
Cookies, device or similar online identifiers (e.g. login-based identifiers, randomly assigned identifiers, network based identifiers) together with other information (e.g. browser type and information, language, screen size, supported technologies etc.) can be stored or read on your device to recognise it each time it connects to an app or to a website, for one or several of the purposes presented here.
List of IAB Vendors‎
| View Illustrations
Personalised advertising and content, advertising and content measurement, audience research and services development
Use limited data to select advertising
652 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Advertising presented to you on this service can be based on limited data, such as the website or app you are using, your non-precise location, your device type or which content you are (or have been) interacting with (for example, to limit the number of times an ad is presented to you).
View Illustrations
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Create profiles for personalised advertising
524 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information about your activity on this service (such as forms you submit, content you look at) can be stored and combined with other information about you (for example, information from your previous activity on this service and other websites or apps) or similar users. This is then used to build or improve a profile about you (that might include possible interests and personal aspects). Your profile can be used (also later) to present advertising that appears more relevant based on your possible interests by this and other entities.
View Illustrations
Use profiles to select personalised advertising
521 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Advertising presented to you on this service can be based on your advertising profiles, which can reflect your activity on this service or other websites or apps (like the forms you submit, content you look at), possible interests and personal aspects.
View Illustrations
Create profiles to personalise content
233 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information about your activity on this service (for instance, forms you submit, non-advertising content you look at) can be stored and combined with other information about you (such as your previous activity on this service or other websites or apps) or similar users. This is then used to build or improve a profile about you (which might for example include possible interests and personal aspects). Your profile can be used (also later) to present content that appears more relevant based on your possible interests, such as by adapting the order in which content is shown to you, so that it is even easier for you to find content that matches your interests.
View Illustrations
Use profiles to select personalised content
205 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Content presented to you on this service can be based on your content personalisation profiles, which can reflect your activity on this or other services (for instance, the forms you submit, content you look at), possible interests and personal aspects. This can for example be used to adapt the order in which content is shown to you, so that it is even easier for you to find (non-advertising) content that matches your interests.
View Illustrations
Measure advertising performance
758 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information regarding which advertising is presented to you and how you interact with it can be used to determine how well an advert has worked for you or other users and whether the goals of the advertising were reached. For instance, whether you saw an ad, whether you clicked on it, whether it led you to buy a product or visit a website, etc. This is very helpful to understand the relevance of advertising campaigns.
View Illustrations
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Measure content performance
374 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information regarding which content is presented to you and how you interact with it can be used to determine whether the (non-advertising) content e.g. reached its intended audience and matched your interests. For instance, whether you read an article, watch a video, listen to a podcast or look at a product description, how long you spent on this service and the web pages you visit etc. This is very helpful to understand the relevance of (non-advertising) content that is shown to you.
View Illustrations
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
475 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Reports can be generated based on the combination of data sets (like user profiles, statistics, market research, analytics data) regarding your interactions and those of other users with advertising or (non-advertising) content to identify common characteristics (for instance, to determine which target audiences are more receptive to an ad campaign or to certain contents).
View Illustrations
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Develop and improve services
564 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information about your activity on this service, such as your interaction with ads or content, can be very helpful to improve products and services and to build new products and services based on user interactions, the type of audience, etc. This specific purpose does not include the development or improvement of user profiles and identifiers.
View Illustrations
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Use limited data to select content
141 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Content presented to you on this service can be based on limited data, such as the website or app you are using, your non-precise location, your device type, or which content you are (or have been) interacting with (for example, to limit the number of times a video or an article is presented to you).
View Illustrations
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
List of IAB Vendors‎
Use precise geolocation data
With your acceptance, your precise location (within a radius of less than 500 metres) may be used in support of the purposes explained in this notice.
List of IAB Vendors‎
Actively scan device characteristics for identification
With your acceptance, certain characteristics specific to your device might be requested and used to distinguish it from other devices (such as the installed fonts or plugins, the resolution of your screen) in support of the purposes explained in this notice.
List of IAB Vendors‎
Always Active
Your data can be used to monitor for and prevent unusual and possibly fraudulent activity (for example, regarding advertising, ad clicks by bots), and ensure systems and processes work properly and securely. It can also be used to correct any problems you, the publisher or the advertiser may encounter in the delivery of content and ads and in your interaction with them.
List of IAB Vendors‎
| View Illustrations
Always Active
Certain information (like an IP address or device capabilities) is used to ensure the technical compatibility of the content or advertising, and to facilitate the transmission of the content or ad to your device.
List of IAB Vendors‎
| View Illustrations
Always Active
Information about your activity on this service may be matched and combined with other information relating to you and originating from various sources (for instance your activity on a separate online service, your use of a loyalty card in-store, or your answers to a survey), in support of the purposes explained in this notice.
List of IAB Vendors‎
Always Active
In support of the purposes explained in this notice, your device might be considered as likely linked to other devices that belong to you or your household (for instance because you are logged in to the same service on both your phone and your computer, or because you may use the same Internet connection on both devices).
List of IAB Vendors‎
Always Active
Your device might be distinguished from other devices based on information it automatically sends when accessing the Internet (for instance, the IP address of your Internet connection or the type of browser you are using) in support of the purposes exposed in this notice.
List of IAB Vendors‎
Always Active
The choices you make regarding the purposes and entities listed in this notice are saved and made available to those entities in the form of digital signals (such as a string of characters). This is necessary in order to enable both this service and those entities to respect such choices.
List of IAB Vendors‎
| View Illustrations
Back Button
Cookie List
Filter Button
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.comscore.com/About-comScore/Privacy-Policy:
Comscore uses cookies to better understand how visitors use our site. If you continue to use our site, you are consenting to the use of these cookies. More information about cookies is available in our
privacy policy
.
Close
Toggle navigation
Solutions
Advertising
Measure and evaluate advertising across platforms
Digital
Measure digital audiences for all content types
Marketing Impact
Maximize marketing effectiveness
Movies
Measure global box office performance
Programmatic Targeting
Powerful programmatic tools to target cross-platform audiences
Social
Understand the value of social media audiences
Television
Get a complete view of television audiences
Solutions for
Automotive
Digital Media
Financial Services
FMCG
Pharmaceutical
Retail
Technology
Travel
Insights
Overview
Rankings
Blog
Presentations & Whitepapers
Join our Email List
Trending Topics
Streaming
Box Office
Sports
Featured
2025 State of Programmatic Report
Events
Overview
About
Overview
Press Room
Leadership
Investor Relations
Locations
Privacy
Security
Third-Party Accreditation
Careers
Overview
Job Opportunities
Proximic
Overview
English
Deutsch
Español (América Latina)
Español (España)
Français
Italiano
Português
Login
My Comscore Home
Comscore TV
OnDemand Essentials
Box Office Essentials
International Box Office Essentials
Shareablee
Contact us
Effective Date: November 22, 2024
Comscore, Inc. (“Comscore”, “we”, “us” or “our”) interacts with current and prospective clients, investors, and the general public via its website, www.comscore.com (“Website”), its mobile application (“Application”), and other Comscore portals. Our online research community has millions of participants who are interested in voicing their opinions as described in the applicable privacy policies and in influencing which products and services are offered.
Comscore subsidiaries operate several research panels and the ScorecardResearch business, which are not governed by this Policy and have different practices. Each panel is governed by the privacy policy that appears on the website assigned to that research panel. Some ScorecardResearch activities are described below where relevant to this Policy. For more details on ScorecardResearch, please view the ScorecardResearch privacy policy
here
.
This Privacy Policy (“Policy”) describes how we process – or, in other words, use, collect, transmit, store, share, and delete – your personal information in connection with your use of our Website, our Application, or other services that refer to or link to this Policy.
The short version
As further described below, under this Policy we may collect the following categories of information (which may be considered personal information or sensitive personal information under certain laws):
personal and online identifiers,
Internet or other electronic network activity,
general geolocation information (inferred from IP address), or precise geolocation information, and
other information about you that is linked to personal information.
We may collect information about you or your household from third parties as well. For details about our practices, please read this entire Policy.
What information is collected and why
We may collect personal information that you choose to provide to us
.
For example, if you contact us through our Website, we may collect personal identifiers (e.g., your name and contact information) as well as any other information that you voluntarily provide to us in order to respond to your inquiry or verify your identity, where necessary. We may also collect personal information that you provide to us when you register for any of our services.
Information collected automatically when you visit our Websites or use our Application.
Our Website and Application automatically create logs regarding your activity on our Website. These logs may identify the features that you use, the actions that you take, and the information that you access while on our Website or mobile Application.
The personal information collected from you in these logs may include online identifiers (e.g., IP address) and Internet or other electronic network activity including information about your browsing behavior, operating system, browser type, website preferences, your use of our Website or Application (e.g., time accessed, duration of visit, etc.). We generally use this information in statistical and aggregate formats to assess the effectiveness of our Website and Application and to better understand the priorities and interests of users of our Website and Application.
Information collected using ScorecardResearch cookies or similar technologies (“Tags”).
This Website may set tags on your browser that collect data for the ScorecardResearch service, a service offered by Full Circle Studies, Inc. (“Full Circle Studies”) which is also part of the Comscore internet ratings and research group. To view the ScorecardResearch privacy policy, please click
here
.
Information collected by third parties.
We may use third parties and service providers to obtain personal information and combine that data with other data that we collect from or about you to improve our Website, Application, products, and services, and to operate our business. Third parties may set a cookie on your computer or device when you visit the Website Application. Third parties may also collect online identifiers associated with your device such as cookie identifiers, mobile or other hardware or device identifiers, and IP addresses.
We may work with third parties, including Google Analytics, who collect information about your use of our Website, other websites, and/or online services over time for non-advertising purposes. For more information about how Google Analytics collects and uses information when you use our Website or Application, please click
here
. To opt out of Google Analytics, click
here
.
Sensitive Personal Information Collected.
Some of the personal information described above is considered sensitive personal information under certain U.S. state privacy laws.  Applying the definitions in these laws, we collect the following categories of sensitive personal information:
Personal information revealing racial or ethnic origin, religious or philosophical beliefs, union membership, a mental or physical condition or diagnosis, sex life or sexual orientation, or citizenship or citizenship status.
We use the categories of sensitive personal information listed above for the purposes described in this Policy, including some purposes that you have the right to limit as described below.
How we share the information we collect
Sharing for business purposes.
We may provide personal information to all categories of third parties and/or service providers listed in this Policy to improve our products and services and to operate our business. We may share all the categories of information listed in this Policy with other companies including Comscore affiliates, subsidiaries, or parent companies as well as third-party data enrichers, data quality aggregators and providers of data matches services:
to operate our products and services or support general operations;
to integrate the products and services of our business partners;
to use third-party cloud services to host our Website, and process and store the information we process about you; and
for any other legitimate business purpose.
Sharing for commercial purposes.
We may share information collected under this Policy with:
our customers, which include, among others, media companies including Google, brands, public relations companies, advertising networks, data analytics providers, distribution partners, and social networks, and marketing and advertising agencies; and
joint industry committees (“JICs”) involved in media audience measurement and research.
Under U.S. state privacy laws, these disclosures may qualify as “sales”. To the extent that our business model constitutes a “sale” under state privacy laws, we shared for interest-based advertising and otherwise “sold” the following categories of personal information in the last 12 months: online identifiers, Internet or other electronic network activity, general geolocation information (inferred from IP address), and other information about you that is linked to personal information. We do not “sell” or share for interest-based advertising any sensitive personal information as defined under U.S. state privacy laws. We “sell”  and share each category of information to the categories of third parties listed above.
Corporate transactions.
In the event of a corporate sale, merger, reorganization, dissolution or similar event, any personal information and data we process from you may become part of the assets we transfer or share in preparation for any such transaction. Any acquirer or successor of Comscore may continue to process personal information consistent with this Privacy Policy.
Compliance and compelled disclosures.
We may share personal information:
with public authorities to respond to subpoenas, court orders, and other legal lawful requests, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements, or as otherwise required by law;
to protect the rights, privacy, safety, and property of Comscore, our customers, our business partners, or others; and
to exercise our legal rights or defend against legal claims, to enforce our contracts, to investigate, respond to and resolve problems or inquiries (including governmental inquiries), or to permit us to pursue available remedies or limit the damages that we may sustain.
How long we keep the information collected
We store your information for as long as is reasonably necessary for the purposes listed above or as required by applicable local law.
Your choices about your personal information
Certain U.S. state and international laws provide individuals with rights related to their personal information. These consumer rights, and the definitions of “personal information” or “personal data” subject to these rights, vary by jurisdiction. Individuals may be able to exercise the following rights, subject to certain exceptions:,
The right to confirm whether Comscore processes personal information about you;
The right to access the categories and specific pieces of personal information collected, used, shared, and sold, and the categories of third parties to whom personal information is sold or shared;,
The right to correct any errors to personal information;
The right to object to the processing of personal information; and
The right to delete the personal information;
The right to opt out of (i) the “sale” of personal information as defined by applicable law or (ii) the sharing of personal information for targeted advertising;
The right to limit the processing of certain “sensitive” personal information (or to withdraw consent to such processing), as defined by applicable law; and
The right not to receive discriminatory treatment for the exercise of privacy rights in accordance with applicable law.
To exercise any of the applicable rights above, please visit our
Data Subject Rights Page
. You may also contact us by email at
DSR@comscore.com
, or by phone at 1-866-675-6141.
We may need to request additional information from you to verify your identity (e.g., your email address, cookie identifier, machine identifier, and/or device identifier) or understand the scope of your request. However, you will not be required to create an account with us to submit a request or have it fulfilled. You may designate an authorized agent to exercise your rights by contacting
DSR@comscore.com
.
For Virginia, Connecticut, or Colorado residents, if you have submitted a request that we have not reasonably fulfilled, you may contact us to appeal our decision by sending an email with the subject line “Appeal” to DSR@comscore.com.
We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of the above rights. We may, however, offer you certain financial incentives permitted by applicable law as compensation for allowing us to collect, sell, share, or maintain your personal information through your participation in our market research efforts.
For information about the number of requests received on an annual basis and additional metrics, please visit our
Data Subject Rights Page
. Please note that we may continue to use information collected during the time that you participated in the Panel, and all such information remains fully subject to, and governed by, the Privacy Policy that was effective at the time the information was collected.
For more information about your choices in relation to your personal information, including your choice to access and delete your personal information, please visit click
here
.
Interest-based advertising and market research
What is interest-based advertising?
Interest-based advertising, also known as online behavioral advertising or targeted advertising, allows advertisers to display ads tailored to your individual interests based on how you browse and shop online.
We may use third parties and service providers, as discussed in the
What information is collected and why
section, to collect information for interest-based advertising. This process may involve third parties and service providers using tagging technology, such as a cookie, on your device. These tags may collect data about your Web browsing over time and across digital properties, including information about the possible relationships among different browsers and devices. We adhere to the Digital Advertising Alliance (“DAA”) Self-Regulatory Principles in connection to all interest-based advertising activities.
The information collected from ScorecardResearch Tags is used for interest-based advertising purposes, where appropriate. ScorecardResearch does not use information collected in the European Union (“EU”) for interest-based advertising services.
How do I manage my preferences for interest-based advertising?
You may visit
www.aboutads.info/choices
to learn more about interest-based advertising, to opt out of our collection and transfer of Web browsing information for interest-based advertising purposes, and to opt out of the collection and use of information for this purpose by other companies that participate in industry self-regulation. Additionally, to opt out of our collection and transfer of application usage information for third parties to use for their own interest-based advertising purposes, you can use any controls that are provided for this purpose by the operating system on your mobile device. Please note that opting out will not stop advertising from appearing in your browser or in the applications you use. It may make the ads you see less relevant to your interests. You may also continue to receive interest-based advertising from other companies.
What is market research?
Market research is an organized effort to gather information about markets and customers. With the use of ScorecardResearch tags and surveys, Comscore’s market research group collects and analyzes information to provide products and services to companies around the world.  This information helps companies better understand and meet the needs of consumers.
How do I manage my preferences for market research?
To control your level of participation in our market research programs or opt out, click
here
. By opting out of our market research program, ScorecardResearch Tags will only be able to count your visit to a particular site but not identify your device beyond that count. Additionally, if your mobile device platform offers settings to limit data collection for interest-based advertising, you can use these settings to opt out of participating in our market research programs.
What does opting out of market research on your browser do?
The browser opt-out mechanisms linked above are cookie based (i.e., a cookie must be on your computer to tell our systems that you have opted out). The cookie-based method does not prevent us from identifying certain events (e.g., when a user visits a website).  The method, however, prevents us from associating that event with your browser or otherwise identifying you beyond us merely counting your visit. If you delete, block, or otherwise restrict cookies, this opt-out may not be effective. Additionally, because different computers and different Internet browsers require their own version of the opt-out cookie, you may need to perform this opt-out process on any computers and browsers that you want to be opted-out.
Other important information about your personal information
Security
. We use organizational, technical, and administrative measures to protect your personal information. For an overview of our security measures,
click here
.
Controller of Personal Information
. Global privacy laws may differentiate between the controller and processor of personal information. For additional information about Comscore’s role with regards to the processing of personal information, please see
https://www.comscore.com/About/Privacy
.
International Visitors and Information Transfers
If you visit our Website or participate in our program from locations outside of the United States, please note that any information you provide to us through your use of our Website or your participation in the program may be transferred to and processed in countries other than the country from which you accessed our Website or participated in our program, including the United States where our central database is operated. Subject to the next paragraph below, please be aware that the United States, and other countries in which your data may be maintained, may have data protection laws that are different from the laws in your country.
We take measures to help protect your personal information when it is transferred from the European Economic Area (“EEA”) and the United Kingdom to other countries. We may rely on European Commission adequacy decisions about certain countries, as applicable (see
here
). Where applicable, we rely on standard contractual clauses approved by the European Commission (see
here
) in our contracts with third parties that receive information outside the EEA and United Kingdom, or we transfer information on the basis of permissible statutory derogations.
For individuals based in the EEA, United Kingdom, or Switzerland, Comscore B.V., Hogehilweg 17, 3rd floor, 1101 CB Amsterdam, the Netherlands, is the controller for personal data collected and processed from website visitors and application, unless otherwise stated in an application-specific privacy policy. Comscore B.V. is a subsidiary of Comscore, Inc.
For more information about our policies on the EU General Data Protection Regulation 2016/679 (“GDPR”), please click
here
. Our GDPR Supplemental Policy includes additional information, which complements this Privacy Policy, relating to the processing of ‘personal data’ and the exercise of rights under the GDPR and United Kingdom data protection laws.
Comscore (including subsidiaries Creative Knowledge, Inc., Full Circle Studies, Inc., TMRG, Inc., VoiceFive, Inc., and ScorResearch, LLC) complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Comscore has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Comscore has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/.
For more information about our compliance with the DPF program, please view our
Data Privacy Framework Statement
.
Changes to our Privacy Policy
We reserve the right to modify or update this Policy periodically. If we change our practices with respect to your information, we will notify you by posting a revised Policy on  our Website with a ”Last Updated” date and  such modified or amended version of this policy shall be effective as to you and your information as of that revision date. We encourage you to revisit this Policy periodically to stay informed about our practices with respect to your information.
Authoritative Version.
When the text of this Policy is available in multiple languages, the English version is the authoritative version, except where prohibited by applicable law.
Contacting Comscore
If you have any concerns, questions, or would just like to better understand our privacy practices, please send an email to
privacy@comscore.com
. If you prefer to contact us by mail, please write to Comscore, Inc., ATTN: Privacy, 11950 Democracy Drive, Reston, VA 20190.
Join Our Email List
Stay Connected
© 2025 Comscore, Inc.
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Contact Us
Please ensure Javascript is enabled for purposes of
website accessibility
Sub-policy 1
https://policies.google.com/?hl=en:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Explains what information we collect and why, how we use it, and how to review and update it.
Read our Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Describes the rules you agree to when using our services.
Read our Terms of Service
Google Safety Center
Making products for everyone means protecting everyone who uses them. Visit safety.google to learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online.
Explore what we do to help keep you safe
Google Account
Control, protect, and secure your account, all in one place. Your Google Account gives you quick access to settings and tools that let you safeguard your data and protect your privacy.
Visit your Google Account
Our Privacy and Security Principles
We build privacy that works for everyone. It’s a responsibility that comes with creating products and services that are accessible for all. We look to these principles to guide our products, our processes, and our people in keeping our users’ data private, safe, and secure.
Explore our Privacy and Security Principles
Google Product Privacy Guide
As you use Gmail, Search, YouTube, and other products from Google, you have the power to control and protect your personal information and usage history. The
Google Product Privacy Guide
can help you find information about how to manage some of the privacy features built into Google's products.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 2
https://www.amazon.com/gp/help/customer/display.html/ref=footer_privacy?ie=UTF8&nodeId=201909010:
Main content
Search
alt
+
/
Cart
shift
+
alt
+
C
Home
shift
+
alt
+
H
Orders
shift
+
alt
+
O
Show/Hide shortcuts
shift
+
alt
+
Z
To move between items, use your keyboard's up or down arrows.
Find more solutions
Security and Privacy
›
Legal Policies
›
Amazon.com Privacy Notice
Last updated: February 14, 2025.
To see prior version,
click
here
.
We know that you care how information about you is used and shared, and we appreciate
            your trust that we will do so carefully and sensibly. This Privacy Notice describes
            how Amazon.com and its affiliates (collectively "Amazon") collect and process your
            personal information through Amazon websites, devices, products, services, online
            and physical stores, and applications that reference this Privacy Notice (together
            "Amazon Services").
By using Amazon Services, you are consenting to the practices described in this Privacy
               Notice.
Please read our
Additional State-Specific Privacy Disclosures
and
Consumer Health Data Privacy Disclosure
for additional information about the processing of your personal data and your rights
                  under applicable U.S. state data privacy laws.
What Personal Information About Customers Does Amazon Collect?
For What Purposes Does Amazon Use Your Personal Information?
What About Cookies and Other Identifiers?
Does Amazon Share Your Personal Information?
How Secure Is Information About Me?
What About Advertising?
What Information Can I Access?
What Choices Do I Have?
Are Children Allowed to Use Amazon Services?
EU-US Data Privacy Framework, UK Extension, and Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework
Conditions of Use, Notices, and Revisions
Related Practices and Information
Examples of Information Collected
What Personal Information About Customers Does Amazon Collect?
We collect your personal information in order to provide and continually improve our
            products and services.
Here are the types of personal information we collect:
Information You Give Us:
We receive and store any information you provide in relation to Amazon Services.
                  Click
here
to see examples of what we collect. You can choose not to provide certain information,
                  but then you might not be able to take advantage of many of our Amazon Services.
Automatic Information:
We automatically collect and store certain types of information about your use of
                  Amazon Services, including information about your interaction with products, content,
                  and services available through Amazon Services. Like many websites, we use "cookies"
                  and other unique identifiers, and we obtain certain types of information when your
                  web browser or device accesses Amazon Services and other content served by or on behalf
                  of Amazon on other websites. Our physical stores may use cameras, computer vision,
                  sensors, and other technology to gather information about your activity in the store,
                  such as the products and services you interact with. Click
here
to see examples of what we collect.
Information from Other Sources:
We might receive information about you from other sources, such as updated delivery
                  and address information from our carriers, which we use to correct our records and
                  deliver your next purchase more easily. Click
here
to see additional examples of the information we receive.
For What Purposes Does Amazon Use Your Personal Information?
We use your personal information to operate, provide, develop, and improve the products
            and services that we offer our customers. These purposes include:
Purchase and delivery of products and services.
We use your personal information to take and handle orders, deliver products and
                  services, process payments, and communicate with you about orders, products and services,
                  and promotional offers.
Provide, troubleshoot, and improve Amazon Services.
We use your personal information to provide functionality, analyze performance, fix
                  errors, and improve the usability and effectiveness of the Amazon Services.
Recommendations and personalization.
We use your personal information to recommend features, products, and services that
                  might be of interest to you, identify your preferences, and personalize your experience
                  with Amazon Services.
Provide voice, image and camera services.
When you use our voice, image and camera services, we use your voice input, images,
                  videos, and other personal information to respond to your requests, provide the requested
                  service to you, and improve our services. For more information about Alexa voice services
                  , click
here
.
Comply with legal obligations.
In certain cases, we collect and use your personal information to comply with laws.
                  For instance, we collect from sellers information regarding place of establishment
                  and bank account information for identity verification and other purposes.
Communicate with you.
We use your personal information to communicate with you in relation to Amazon Services
                  via different channels (e.g., by phone, email, chat).
Advertising.
We use your personal information to display interest-based ads for features, products,
                  and services that might be of interest to you. We do not use information that personally
                  identifies you to display interest-based ads. To learn more, please read our
Interest-Based Ads
notice.
Fraud Prevention and Credit Risks.
We use personal information to prevent and detect fraud and abuse in order to protect
                  the security of our customers, Amazon, and others. We may also use scoring methods
                  to assess and manage credit risks.
What About Cookies and Other Identifiers?
To enable our systems to recognize your browser or device and to provide and improve
            Amazon Services, we use cookies and other identifiers. For more information about
            cookies and how we use them, please read our
Cookies Notice
.
Does Amazon Share Your Personal Information?
Information about our customers is an important part of our business, and we are not
            in the business of selling our customers' personal information to others. We share
            customers' personal information only as described below and with subsidiaries Amazon.com,
            Inc. controls that either are subject to this Privacy Notice or follow practices at
            least as protective as those described in this Privacy Notice.
Transactions involving Third Parties:
We make available to you services, products, applications, or skills provided by
                  third parties for use on or through Amazon Services. For example, you can order products
                  from third parties through our stores, download applications from third-party application
                  providers from our App Store, and enable third-party skills through our Alexa services.
                  We also offer services or sell product lines jointly with third-party businesses,
                  such as co-branded credit cards. You can tell when a third party is involved in your
                  transactions, and we share customers' personal information related to those transactions
                  with that third party.
Third-Party Service Providers:
We employ other companies and individuals to perform functions on our behalf. Examples
                  include fulfilling orders for products or services, delivering packages, sending postal
                  mail and email, removing repetitive information from customer lists, analyzing data,
                  providing marketing assistance, providing search results and links (including paid
                  listings and links), processing payments, transmitting content, scoring, assessing
                  and managing credit risk, and providing customer service. These third-party service
                  providers have access to personal information needed to perform their functions, but
                  may not use it for other purposes.
Business Transfers:
As we continue to develop our business, we might sell or buy other businesses or services.
                  In such transactions, customer information generally is one of the transferred business
                  assets but remains subject to the promises made in any pre-existing Privacy Notice
                  (unless, of course, the customer consents otherwise). Also, in the unlikely event
                  that Amazon.com, Inc. or substantially all of its assets are acquired, customer information
                  will of course be one of the transferred assets.
Protection of Amazon and Others:
We release account and other personal information when we believe release is appropriate
                  to comply with the law; enforce or apply our
Conditions of Use
and other agreements; or protect the rights, property, or safety of Amazon, our users,
                  or others. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organizations
                  for fraud protection and credit risk reduction.
Other than as set out above, you will receive notice when personal information about
            you might be shared with third parties, and you will have an opportunity to choose
            not to share the information.
How Secure Is Information About Me?
We design our systems with your security and privacy in mind.
We work to protect the security of your personal information during transmission by
                  using encryption protocols and software.
We follow the Payment Card Industry Data Security Standard (PCI DSS) when handling
                  credit card data.
We maintain physical, electronic, and procedural safeguards in connection with the
                  collection, storage, and disclosure of customer personal information. Our security
                  procedures mean that we may ask to verify your identity before we disclose personal
                  information to you.
Our devices offer security features to protect them against unauthorized access and
                  loss of data. You can control these features and configure them based on your needs.
                  Click
here
for more information on how to manage the security settings of your device.
It is important for you to protect against unauthorized access to your password and
                  to your computers, devices, and applications. We recommend using a unique password
                  for your Amazon account that is not used for other online accounts. Be sure to sign
                  off when finished using a shared computer. Click
here
for more information on how to sign off.
What About Advertising?
Third-Party Advertisers and Links to Other Websites:
Amazon Services may include third-party advertising and links to other websites and
                  apps. Third-party advertising partners may collect information about you when you
                  interact with their content, advertising, and services. For more information about
                  third-party advertising at Amazon, including interest-based ads, please read our
Interest-Based Ads
notice. To adjust your advertising preferences, please go to the
Your Ads Privacy Choices
page.
Use of Third-Party Advertising Services:
We provide ad companies with information that allows them to serve you with more
                  useful and relevant Amazon ads and to measure their effectiveness. We never share
                  your name or other information that directly identifies you when we do this. Instead,
                  we use an advertising identifier like a cookie, a device identifier, or a code derived
                  from applying irreversible cryptography to other information like an email address.
                  For example, if you have already downloaded one of our apps, we will share your advertising
                  identifier and data about that event so that you will not be served an ad to download
                  the app again. While we do not share your specific shopping actions like purchases,
                  product views, or searches with ad companies, we may share an advertising identifier
                  and an estimate of the value of the ads they show you on our behalf so they can serve
                  you with more effective Amazon ads. Some ad companies also use this information to
                  serve you relevant ads from other advertisers. You can learn more about how to opt-out
                  of personalized advertising (such as cross-context behavioral advertising) by going
                  to the
Your Ads Privacy Choices
page.
What Information Can I Access?
You can access your information, including your name, address, payment options, profile
            information, Prime membership, household settings, and purchase history in the "Your
            Account" section of the website. Click
here
for a list of examples that you can access.
What Choices Do I Have?
If you have any questions as to how we collect and use your personal information,
            please contact our
Customer Service
. Many of our Amazon Services also include settings that provide you with options
            as to how your information is being used.
As described above, you can choose not to provide certain information, but then you
                  might not be able to take advantage of many of the Amazon Services.
You can add or update certain information on pages such as those referenced in
What Information Can I Access?
. When you update information, we usually keep a copy of the prior version for our
                  records.
If you do not want to receive email or other communications from us, please adjust
                  your
Customer Communication Preferences
. If you don't want to receive in-app notifications from us, please adjust your notification
                  settings in the app or device.
You may adjust your personalized advertising preferences by visiting
Your Ads Privacy Choices
.
The Help feature on most browsers and devices will tell you how to prevent your browser
                  or device from accepting new cookies or other identifiers, how to have the browser
                  notify you when you receive a new cookie, or how to block cookies altogether. Because
                  cookies and identifiers allow you to take advantage of some essential features of
                  Amazon Services, we recommend that you leave them turned on. For instance, if you
                  block or otherwise reject our cookies, you will not be able to add items to your Shopping
                  Cart, proceed to Checkout, or use any Services that require you to Sign in. For more
                  information about cookies and other identifiers, see our
Cookies Notice
.
If you want to browse our websites without linking the browsing history to your account,
                  you may do so by logging out of your account
here
and blocking cookies on your browser.
You can manage the recommendations you receive in our store
here
, remove recommendations you don’t want to see
here
by selecting View All and Manage then selecting the Remove Items toggle that appears
                  at the top of the page, and edit your browsing history
here
.
You will also be able to opt out of certain other types of data usage by updating
                  your settings on the applicable Amazon website (e.g., in "Manage Your Content and
                  Devices"), device, or application. For more information click
here
. Most non-Amazon devices also provide users with the ability to change device permissions
                  (e.g., disable/access location services, contacts). For most devices, these controls
                  are located in the device's settings menu. If you have questions about how to change
                  your device permissions on devices manufactured by third parties, we recommend you
                  contact your mobile service carrier or your device manufacturer.
If you are a seller, you can add or update certain information in
Seller Central
, update your account information by accessing your
Seller Account Information
, and adjust your email or other communications you receive from us by updating your
Notification Preferences
.
If you are an author, you can add or update the information you have provided in the
Author Portal
and
Author Central
by accessing your accounts in the Author Portal and Author Central, respectively.
If you shop in our physical stores, you can manage how certain data is used to analyze
                  the performance of our products and services, as well as learn more
here
.
In addition, to the extent required by applicable law, you may have the right to request
            access to or delete your personal information. If you wish to do any of these things,
            you may go to
Data Privacy Queries
. Depending on your data choices, certain services may be limited or unavailable.
Are Children Allowed to Use Amazon Services?
Amazon does not sell products for purchase by children. We sell children's products
            for purchase by adults. If you are under 18, you may use Amazon Services only with
            the involvement of a parent or guardian. We do not knowingly collect personal information
            from children under the age of 13 without the consent of the child's parent or guardian.
            For more information, please see our
Children's Privacy Disclosure
.
EU-US Data Privacy Framework, UK Extension, and Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework
Amazon.com, Inc. participates in the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension
            to the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework. Click
here
to learn more.
Conditions of Use, Notices, and Revisions
If you choose to use Amazon Services, your use and any dispute over privacy is subject
            to this Notice and our
Conditions of Use
, including limitations on damages, resolution of disputes, and application of the
            law of the state of Washington. If you have any concern about privacy at Amazon, please
            contact us with a thorough description, and we will try to resolve it. Our business
            changes constantly, and our Privacy Notice will change also. You should check our
            websites frequently to see recent changes. Unless stated otherwise, our current Privacy
            Notice applies to all information that we have about you and your account. We stand
            behind the promises we make, however, and will never materially change our policies
            and practices to make them less protective of customer information collected in the
            past without the consent of affected customers.
Related Practices and Information
Conditions of Use
Seller Program Policies
Help pages
Most Recent Purchases
Community Guidelines
Examples of Information Collected
Information You Give Us When You Use Amazon Services
You provide information to us when you:
search or shop for products or services in our stores;
add or remove an item from your cart, or place an order through or use Amazon Services;
download, stream, view, or use content on a device or through a service or application
                  on a device;
provide information in
Your Account
(and you might have more than one if you have used more than one email address or
                  mobile number when shopping with us) or
Your Profile
;
talk to or otherwise interact with our Alexa Voice service;
upload your contacts;
configure your settings on, provide data access permissions for, or interact with
                  an Amazon device or service;
provide information in your
Seller Account
,
Kindle Direct Publishing
account
,
Developer
account
, or any other account we make available that allows you to develop or offer software,
                  goods, or services to Amazon customers;
offer your products or services on or through Amazon Services;
communicate with us by phone, email, or otherwise;
complete a questionnaire, a support ticket, or a contest entry form;
upload or stream images, videos or other files to Prime Photos, Amazon Drive, or other
                  Amazon Services;
use our services such as Prime Video;
compile Playlists, Watchlists,
Wish Lists
, or other gift registries;
participate in Discussion Boards or other community features;
provide and rate
Reviews
;
specify a Special Occasion Reminder; or
employ
Product Availability Alerts
, such as Available to Order Notifications.
As a result of those actions, you might supply us with such information as:
identifying information such as your name, address, and phone numbers;
payment information;
your age;
your location information;
your IP address;
people, addresses and phone numbers listed in your Addresses;
email addresses of your friends and other people;
content of reviews and emails to us;
personal description and photograph in
Your Profile
;
voice recordings when you speak to Alexa;
images and videos collected or stored in connection with Amazon Services;
information and documents regarding identity, including Social Security and driver's
                        license numbers;
corporate and financial information;
credit history information; and
device log files and configurations, including Wi-Fi credentials, if you choose to
                        automatically synchronize them with your other Amazon devices.
Automatic Information
Examples of the information we collect and analyze include:
the internet protocol (IP) address used to connect your computer to the internet;
login, email address, and password;
the location of your device or computer;
content interaction information, such as content downloads, streams, and playback
                  details, including duration and number of simultaneous streams and downloads, and
                  network details for streaming and download quality, including information about your
                  internet service provider;
device metrics such as when a device is in use, application usage, connectivity data,
                  and any errors or event failures;
Amazon Services metrics (e.g., the occurrences of technical errors, your interactions
                  with service features and content, your settings preferences and backup information,
                  location of your device running an application, information about uploaded images
                  and files such as the file name, dates, times and location of your images);
version and time zone settings;
purchase and content use history, which we sometimes aggregate with similar information
                  from other customers to create features like
Top Sellers
;
the full Uniform Resource Locator (URL) clickstream to, through, and from our websites,
                  including date and time; products and content you viewed or searched for; page response
                  times, download errors, length of visits to certain pages, and page interaction information
                  (such as scrolling, clicks, and mouse-overs);
phone numbers used to call our customer service number; and
images or videos when you shop in our stores, or stores using Amazon Services.
We may also use device identifiers, cookies, and other technologies on devices, applications,
            and our web pages to collect browsing, usage, or other technical information.
Information from Other Sources
Examples of information we receive from other sources include:
updated delivery and address information from our carriers or other third parties,
                  which we use to correct our records and deliver your next purchase or communication
                  more easily;
account information, purchase or redemption information, and page-view information
                  from some merchants with which we operate co-branded businesses or for which we provide
                  technical, fulfillment, advertising, or other services;
information about your interactions with products and services offered by our subsidiaries;
search results and links, including paid listings (such as Sponsored Links);
information about internet-connected devices and services linked with Alexa; and
credit history information from credit bureaus, which we use to help prevent and detect
                  fraud and to offer certain credit or financial services to some customers.
Information You Can Access
Examples of information you can access through Amazon Services include:
status of recent orders (including subscriptions);
your complete order history;
personally identifiable information (including name, email, password, and address
                  book);
payment settings (including payment card information, promotional certificate and
                  gift card balances, and 1-Click settings);
email notification settings (including Product Availability Alerts, Delivers, Special
                  Occasion Reminders and newsletters);
recommendations and the products you recently viewed that are the basis for recommendations
                  (including Recommended for You and Improve Your Recommendations);
shopping lists and gift registries (including Wish Lists and Baby and Wedding Registries);
your content, devices, services, and related settings, and communications and personalized
                  advertising preferences;
content that you recently viewed;
voice recordings associated with your account;
Your Profile (including your product Reviews, Recommendations, Reminders and personal
                  profile);
If you are a seller, you can access your account and other information, and adjust
                  your communications preferences, by updating your account in
Seller Central
.
If you are an author, you can access your account and other information, and update
                  your accounts, on the
Kindle Direct Publishing (KDP)
or
Author Central
website, as applicable.
If you are a developer participating in our Developer Services Program, you can access
                  your account and other information, and adjust your communications preferences, by
                  updating your accounts in the
Developer Services Portal
.
Was this information helpful?
Yes
No
Thank you for your feedback.
Please select what best describes the information:
This information is confusing or wrong
This isn't the information I was looking for
I don't like this policy
Submit
Thanks! While we're unable to respond directly to your feedback, 
	we'll use this information to improve our online Help.
‹
All Help Topics
Legal Policies
Consumer Health Data Privacy Disclosure
3rd Party Licensing Notice
AMAZON INFLUENCER TERMS & CONDITIONS FOR SPONSORED CONTENT
Conditions of Use
Communications with Amazon Employees
Report Suspicious Activity
Amazon.com Privacy Notice
Amazon Group Companies
Amazon Trademark Usage Guidelines
Non-Exhaustive List of Amazon Trademarks
Amazon.com Gift Card and Electronic Message Customization Service Terms
Quick solutions
Your Orders
                                            Track or cancel orders
Your Orders
Track or cancel orders
Returns & Refunds
                                            Exchange or return items
Returns & Refunds
Exchange or return items
Manage Prime
                                            Cancel or view benefits
Manage Prime
Cancel or view benefits
Payment Settings
                                            Add or edit payment methods
Payment Settings
Add or edit payment methods
Carrier Info
                                            Shipping carrier information
Carrier Info
Shipping carrier information
Account Settings
                                            Change email or password
Account Settings
Change email or password
Sub-policy 3
https://liveramp.com/privacy/:
Data is a powerful tool. At LiveRamp, we believe a culture of accountability is essential to success in a data-driven world.
Read our Privacy Notices
Where required, we maintain privacy notices for various business purposes and multiple regions or regulatory jurisdictions of the world. The choices available to an individual may vary within these areas based on local laws and customs. Our full list of privacy notices is available on this page. Please select a privacy notice below to
understand what information we collect, how the information is used and what choices you have to protect your information.
General Privacy Notices
Product and Service Privacy Notice
(How we handle data within our databases when we are the business or controller.)
Web and Business Representative Privacy Notice
(How we handle data on this website and collected from corporate activities and events.)
Specific Country or U.S. State Privacy Notices
North America
California Privacy Notice
(How we handle personal data for California residents.)
Mexico Privacy Notice
(How we handle personal data for Mexico residents.)
Asia-Pacific
Australia Privacy Policies
Japan
European Union and United Kingdom
UK
France
Germany
Italy
Netherlands
Spain
Security
In addition to our privacy notices, we maintain strict security policies and procedures. See our
Data Security Knowledge Base page
for details.
Your Privacy Choices
You may have certain legal rights with respect to data. These rights may include the right of access, deletion, limiting the use of or correction of personal data. These rights may be limited, for example if fulfilling your request would reveal personal data about another person, if they would infringe the rights of a third party (including our rights) or if you ask us to delete information which we are required by law to keep or have compelling legitimate interests in keeping. We will inform you of any relevant exemptions we rely upon when responding to any request you make.
Select the appropriate link below to exercise your rights:
Universal LiveRamp Opt Out Tools
United States Your Privacy Choices portal
Asia Pacific Countries (except Australia), email
apaclegal@liveramp.com
Australia Your Rights portal
Canada Your Rights portal
EEA Countries
The UK Your Rights Portal
France
residents, email dpo.de@liveramp.com
Germany residents
,
email privacy.de@liveramp.com
Spain
residents, email privacy.es@liveramp.com
Italy
residents, email privacy.it@liveramp.com
Belgium residents, email privacy.be@liveramp.com
The Netherlands residents, email privacy.nl@liveramp.com
Mexico Your Rights portal